Hawaii, session 2026, HB1745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the original Hawaii clean energy initiative framework, adopted in 2008, established the goal that, by 2030, seventy per cent of energy generation in the State should come from renewable energy resources. The seventy per cent goal was based on a state estimate that sixty to seventy per cent of future energy needs could be fulfilled by local, clean, renewable energy resources.  Since that time, the State's renewable portfolio standards have been amended to provide that, by December 31, 2045, one hundred per cent of net electricity generation should come from renewable energy resources. The legislature further finds that, although the State has made progress under the current framework, reaching approximately thirty to thirty-five per cent renewable energy generation statewide as of 2025, it remains far from meeting the one hundred per cent mandate by 2045.  The legislature believes that as an isolated island electricity grid, Hawaii must prioritize energy security, reliability, and affordability, and return to realistic implementation timelines to reach the State's clean energy goals. The legislature recognizes the necessity of restoring a balanced and achievable clean energy policy for Hawaii that acknowledges infrastructure limitations, the continued need for firm and dispatchable energy generation, and the importance of diversified energy resources, while avoiding strict mandates that risk higher costs for ratepayers, may cause grid instability and may lead to the State's overreliance on unproven or insufficiently scaled technologies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to repeal the one hundred per cent renewable energy mandate and restore the State's renewable portfolio standard cap to seventy per cent by 2045. SECTION 2.  Section 269-92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Each electric utility company that sells electricity for consumption in the State shall establish a renewable portfolio standard of: (1)  Ten per cent of its net electricity sales by December 31, 2010; (2)  Fifteen per cent of its net electricity sales by December 31, 2015; (3)  Thirty per cent of its net electricity sales by December 31, 2020; (4)  Forty per cent of its net electricity generation by December 31, 2030; and (5)  Seventy per cent of its net electricity generation by December 31, [2040; and (6)  One hundred per cent of its net electricity generation by December 31, 2045.] 2045." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________